Washington statutes.
RCW 3.66.115

"Legal financial obligation"—Defined.

"Legal financial obligation" means a sum of money that is ordered by a district or municipal court of the state of Washington for legal financial obligations which may include restitution to the victim, court costs, county or interlocal drug funds, court-appointed attorneys' fees, and costs of defense, fines, and any other financial obligation that is assessed to the offender as a result of a conviction. Legal financial obligations may also include payment to a public agency of the expense of an emergency response to the incident resulting in the conviction, subject to RCW 38.52.430.

[ 2022 c 260 s 18.]

NOTES:

Construction—Effective date—2022 c 260: See notes following RCW 3.66.120.